Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-17,110
Conversion.

(1) A credit union incorporated under the laws of this state may be converted into a federal credit union organized under the laws of the United States as prescribed in section 21-17,111.

(2) A federal credit union organized under the laws of the United States may be converted into a credit union organized under the laws of this state as prescribed in section 21-17,112.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 110.